src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON мс_мн._одуш._[п_a]
+Pron+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
+Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+Pron+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+Pron+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+Pron+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+Pron+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON мс_мо_[п_b]_SgOnly
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>о́й # ;
+Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>о́го # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>о́го # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>о́му # ;
+Pron+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс_с_[п_b]_SgOnly
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́е # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́е # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>о́го # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>о́му # ;
+Pron+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс_жо_[п_b]_SgOnly
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́я # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́ю # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
+Pron+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>о́ю # ;
