src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
любой:люб мс_мо_[п_b]_SgOnly ; ! склоняется_как_мо_ед._от_мс-п_любо/й
остальное:остальн мс_с_[п_b]_SgOnly ; ! склоняется_как_с_ед._от_остально/й
любая:люб мс_жо_[п_b]_SgOnly ; ! склоняется_как_жо_ед._от_любо/й
многие:мно́г мс_мн._одуш._[п_a] ; ! склоняется_как_мн._одуш._от_мно/гий
немногие:немно́г мс_мн._одуш._[п_a] ; ! склоняется_как_мн._одуш._от_немно/гий
некоторые:не́котор мс_мн._одуш._[п_a] ; ! склоняется_как_мн._одуш._от_не/который
